Maine, session 132, LD2150.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §60 is enacted to read:
§60. Restriction of access to state property or services; restriction of communication
with or through entities of the State
1. Entity of the State; definition. As used in this section, "entity of the State" means
any office, department, agency, authority, commission, board, institution, hospital or other
instrumentality of the State, except that "entity of the State" does not include a public
institution of higher education.
2. Notice or communication of restriction. An entity of the State that issues a notice
or communication, or a local law enforcement agency that issues a notice or communication
on behalf of an entity of the State, that restricts a person from accessing state property or
services provided by the State or from communicating with or through the entity to which
an otherwise unrestricted person would have access must issue the notice or
communication in writing to the restricted person. The written notice or communication
must include the factual basis for the entity of the State's decision to restrict the person's
access or communication as well as information describing the procedure to challenge the
notice or communication. The issuance of a court order does not satisfy the requirements
of this subsection.
3. Final agency action. A notice or communication issued pursuant to this section
constitutes final agency action for the purposes of review under chapter 375.
4. Copy to Department of Public Safety. An entity of the State other than the
Department of Public Safety that issues a written notice or communication pursuant to this
section shall send a copy of that notice or communication to the Department of Public
Safety.
5. Applicability. This section does not apply to the Department of Corrections with
respect to placing restrictions on a resident of a department facility as defined under Title
34-A, section 3015, subsection 1.
Page 1 - 132LR2840(07)

Sec. 2. Department of Public Safety; data collection, report. No later than
January 15, 2028, the Department of Public Safety shall, within existing resources, submit
a report regarding the implementation of the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 60 to
the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over judiciary matters.
The report must include at least the following data:
1. The number of notices or communications issued by or on behalf of an entity of the
State;
2. The number of notices or communications issued by or on behalf of an entity of the
State that were subsequently violated by the person being restricted;
3. A list of the entities of the State that issued notices or communications and the
number of notices or communications issued on behalf of each entity;
4. The geographic scope of the impact that the notice or communication issued to the
restricted person has on the entity of the State, including whether the notice or
communication was issued for a regional office or offices across the State;
5. The final duration of each notice or communication; and
6. The number of notices or communications that were challenged pursuant to Title 5,
chapter 375.
The joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over judiciary
matters may report out legislation based on the findings and recommendations of the report
to the Second Regular Session of the 133rd Legislature.
Page 2 - 132LR2840(07)